Florida, session 2026, SB1658.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (d) through (i) of subsection 16 (5) of section 253.034, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 17 paragraphs (e) through (j), respectively, a new paragraph (d) is 18 added to that subsection, and subsection (4) and present 19 paragraph (g) of subsection (5) of that section are amended, to 20 read: 21 253.034âState-owned lands; uses.â 22 (4)âA management agreement, lease, or other instrument 23 authorizing the use of lands owned by the board of trustees may 24 not be executed for a period greater than is necessary to 25 provide for the reasonable use of the land for the existing or 26 planned life cycle or amortization of the improvements, except 27 that an easement in perpetuity may be granted by the board of 28 trustees if the improvement is a transportation facility. If an 29 entity managing or leasing state-owned lands from the board of 30 trustees does not meet the short-term goals under paragraph 31 (5)(b) for conservation lands, the Department of Environmental 32 Protection may submit the lands to the Acquisition and 33 Restoration Council to review whether the short-term goals 34 should be modified, consider whether the lands should be offered 35 to another entity for management or leasing, or recommend to the 36 board of trustees whether to surplus the lands. If an entity 37 managing or leasing state-owned lands from the board of trustees 38 does not meet the short-term goals under paragraph (5)(j) (5)(i) 39 for nonconservation lands, the department may submit the lands 40 to the board of trustees to consider whether to require the 41 managing or leasing entity to release its interest in the lands 42 and to consider whether to surplus the lands. If the state-owned 43 lands are determined to be surplus, the board of trustees may 44 require an entity to release its interest in the lands. An 45 entity managing or leasing state-owned lands from the board of 46 trustees may not sublease such lands without prior review by the 47 Division of State Lands and, for conservation lands, by the 48 Acquisition and Restoration Council. All management agreements, 49 leases, or other instruments authorizing the use of lands owned 50 by the board of trustees shall be reviewed for approval by the 51 board of trustees or its designee. The council is not required 52 to review subleases of parcels which are less than 160 acres in 53 size. 54 (5)âEach manager of conservation lands shall submit to the 55 Division of State Lands a land management plan at least every 10 56 years in a form and manner adopted by rule of the board of 57 trustees and in accordance with s. 259.032. Each manager of 58 conservation lands shall also update a land management plan 59 whenever the manager proposes to add new facilities or make 60 substantive land use or management changes that were not 61 addressed in the approved plan, or within 1 year after the 62 addition of significant new lands. Each manager of 63 nonconservation lands shall submit to the Division of State 64 Lands a land use plan at least every 10 years in a form and 65 manner adopted by rule of the board of trustees. The division 66 shall review each plan for compliance with the requirements of 67 this subsection and the requirements of the rules adopted by the 68 board of trustees pursuant to this section. All nonconservation 69 land use plans, whether for single-use or multiple-use 70 properties, must be managed to provide the greatest benefit to 71 the state. Plans for managed areas larger than 1,000 acres must 72 contain an analysis of the multiple-use potential of the 73 property which includes the potential of the property to 74 generate revenues to enhance the management of the property. In 75 addition, the plan must contain an analysis of the potential use 76 of private land managers to facilitate the restoration or 77 management of these lands and whether nonconservation lands 78 would be more appropriately transferred to the county or 79 municipality in which the land is located for the purpose of 80 providing affordable multifamily rental housing that meets the 81 criteria of s. 420.0004(3). If a newly acquired property has a 82 valid conservation plan that was developed by a soil and water 83 conservation district, such plan must be used to guide 84 management of the property until a formal land use plan is 85 completed. 86 (d)âWhen a land management plan is developed or updated, 87 the land managing entity must consider the feasibility of 88 leasing portions of the land to private entities for cattle 89 grazing. Any lands determined to be suitable must be described 90 in the land management plan, and the land managing entity must 91 allow such lands to be leased for such purpose. If the land 92 managing entity determines no portions of the land are suitable 93 for such leases, the entity must include an explanation for its 94 determination in the land management plan. 95 (h)(g)âThe Division of State Lands shall make available to 96 the public at least 30 days before the public hearing required 97 by paragraph (g) (f) an electronic copy of each land management 98 plan for parcels that exceed 160 acres in size and for parcels 99 located within a state park. The division shall review each plan 100 for compliance with the requirements of this subsection, the 101 requirements of chapter 259, and the requirements of the rules 102 adopted by the board of trustees pursuant to this section. The 103 Acquisition and Restoration Council shall also consider the 104 propriety of the recommendations of the managing entity with 105 regard to the future use of the property, the protection of 106 fragile or nonrenewable resources, the potential for alternative 107 or multiple uses not recognized by the managing entity, and the 108 possibility of disposal of the property by the board of 109 trustees. After its review, the council shall submit the plan, 110 along with its recommendations and comments, to the board of 111 trustees. The council shall specifically recommend to the board 112 of trustees whether to approve the plan as submitted, approve 113 the plan with modifications, or reject the plan. If the council 114 fails to make a recommendation for a land management plan, the 115 Secretary of Environmental Protection, Commissioner of 116 Agriculture, or executive director of the Fish and Wildlife 117 Conservation Commission or their designees must submit the land 118 management plan to the board of trustees. 119 Section 2.âThe amendments made to s. 253.034, Florida 120 Statutes, by this act apply to land management plans developed 121 or updated on or after July 1, 2026. 122 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.